Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 3. Safety and Inspection Standards of Municipal Gas Systems.

§ 77-11-101.
Commission shall provide for standards of safety and inspection of gas districts, municipal gas systems, and certain pipelines.

The Mississippi Public Service Commission is hereby vested with authority to provide for standards of safety and inspection of gas districts, or municipally owned and/or operated transmission or distribution of natural, artificial, or mixed natural and artificial gas, by means of transportation, transmission or distribution facilities and equipment municipally owned and/or operated by said municipality or gas district. To the maximum extent permissible under the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, the commission is also hereby vested with authority to provide for standards of safety and inspection of facilities owned and/or operated as private pipelines, private pipeline carriers or private pipeline carriers by contract which are not engaged in the transmission, sale, sale for resale or distribution of gas to the public for compensation and which are not therefore subject to the general jurisdiction of the commission as public utilities, which said facilities are used for the intrastate transmission or distribution of natural, artificial and mixed natural and artificial gas by means of intrastate transportation, transmission or distribution facilities or equipment owned and/or operated by any such pipeline.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-11; Laws, 1971, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 405, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1973).

§ 77-11-103.
Commission shall prescribe standards and procedures.

To carry out the provisions of this article, the public service commission shall prescribe the safety standards and inspection procedures for said gas districts or municipally owned and/or operated gas systems and for said private pipelines, private pipeline carriers and private pipeline carriers by contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-12; Laws, 1971, ch. 395, § 2; Laws, 1973, ch. 405, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1973).

§ 77-11-105.
Enforcement of federal safety standards.

The public service commission shall have the right, power and authority to provide and make certification, reports and information to the secretary of the United States Department of Transportation; to enter into agreements with said secretary to carry out the purposes of this article; to enforce federal safety standards in the State of Mississippi in lieu of enforcement by the said department of transportation; and to exercise regulatory jurisdiction over the safety of pipeline systems owned and/or operated by gas districts or municipalities and said private pipelines, private pipeline carriers and private pipeline carriers by contract in the transportation of gas as permitted by the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-13; Laws, 1971, ch. 395, § 3; Laws, 1973, ch. 405, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1973).

§ 77-11-107.
Promulgation of rules and regulations; inspection; right of access.

In order to determine whether or not each gas district or municipally owned and/or operated gas system or pipeline or privately owned or operated gas pipeline is operating in compliance with the required safety standards and to enforce such compliance, the Mississippi Public Service Commission shall have the right, power and authority to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to facilitate such purpose. Authorized personnel of the commission shall be authorized to inspect all such gas districts, municipally or privately owned and/or operated gas systems, pipelines, facilities and equipment and shall have the right of access and entry to all buildings and property owned, leased and operated by such systems. Other information shall be made available to the commission upon request.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-14; Laws, 1971, ch. 395, § 4; Laws, 1973, ch. 405, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1973).

§ 77-11-109.
Penalty.

Each gas district or municipally owned utility or privately owned and/or operated gas pipeline in the State of Mississippi shall be subject to the same penalty as other gas utilities for failure to comply with the gas pipeline safety standards adopted by the Mississippi Public Service Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-15; Laws, 1971, ch. 395, § 5; Laws, 1973, ch. 405, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1973).

§ 77-11-111.
Limitation of commission’s authority.

This article authorizes the Mississippi Public Service Commission to exercise jurisdiction over gas pipeline safety and inspection of gas districts or municipally owned and/or operated gas utilities or privately owned and operated gas pipelines which do not sell, transport or distribute gas to the public, and whose facilities are used for the intrastate transmission or distribution of natural, artificial and mixed natural and artificial gas, but all other operations, services and rates of gas districts or municipally owned and/or operated gas utilities or such privately owned and operated gas pipelines which do not sell, transport or distribute gas to the public shall remain exclusively with the gas districts or municipality or municipally owned and/or operated gas utility or with the owner and/or operator of such private pipeline not serving the public.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-16; Laws, 1971, ch. 395, § 6; Laws, 1973, ch. 405, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1973).